Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 6. Vacancies in Town Offices

§ 961.
Vacancy or suspension of officer’s duties.

When a municipal officer resigns the officer’s office, has been removed from the office, dies, becomes unable to perform the officer’s duties due to a mental condition or psychiatric disability, or removes from town, the office shall become vacant. Notice of this vacancy shall be posted by the legislative body in at least two public places in the municipality, and in and near the municipal clerk’s office, within 10 days of the creation of the vacancy.

In the event there are so many vacancies on the legislative body that a quorum cannot be achieved, the remaining member or members of the legislative body shall be authorized to draw orders for payment of continuing obligations and necessary expenses until the vacancies are filled pursuant to section 963 of this title.

The legislative body of a county, municipality, or special purpose district may designate a person to perform the duties of an officer whose duties have been suspended as a condition of release pending trial for violating

13 V.S.A. § 2537

.

When a municipal officer refuses or neglects within 30 days of election or appointment to take an oath of office pursuant to section 831 of this title, the office shall become vacant. However, the office shall not be deemed vacant until the legislative body of the municipality has warned a regular meeting for that purpose and affords the municipal officer the opportunity to take the oath of office at the meeting.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

1993, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 30, 1994;

2007, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 150;

2021, No. 16

, § 1.

§ 962.
Special meeting.

A town at a special meeting may fill a vacancy in a town office.

§ 963.
Duties of selectboard; special meeting.

When a vacancy occurs in any town office, the selectboard forthwith by appointment in writing shall fill such vacancy until an election is had; except that in the event of vacancies in a majority of the selectboard at the same time, such vacancies shall be filled by a special town meeting called for that purpose.

The selectboard shall file an appointment made under this section in the office of the town clerk and the town clerk shall duly record it in the book of town records.

If there are no selectboard members in office, the Secretary of State shall call a special election to fill any vacancies and for that interim shall appoint and authorize the town clerk or another qualified person to draw orders for payment of continuing obligations and necessary expenses until the vacancies are filled.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

1993, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 30, 1994;

2017, No. 50

, § 60.